en: pale-leaf woodland sunflower
fr: hélianthi, hélianthe scrofuleux, hélianti, héliantis, salsifis d'Amérique, racine d'hélianthi
hr: pale-leaf šumski suncokret
la: helianthus strumosus

en: asclepias
it: asclepias
sr: miluk

en: parsnip
ar: جزر أبيض
az: Əkin cırhavucu
ba: Пастернак үләне
be: Пастарнак
bg: Пащърнак
bn: পার্সনিপ
br: Panez
ca: xirivia
cs: pastinák
cy: Panasen
da: pastinak
de: Pastinake, Pastinaken
el: Παστινάκη
eo: pastinako
es: Pastinaca, chirivia
et: pastinaak, Aed-moorputk
eu: Txiribi
fa: شقاقل
fi: Palsternakka
fr: panais
ga: Meacan bán
gd: Curran geal
gl: Charouvía
gv: Pesmad
he: גזר לבן
hr: pastrnjak
hu: Pasztinák
io: Pastinako
is: Nípa
it: pastinaca
ja: パースニップ
ka: ძირთეთრა
kk: Ботташық
ko: 설탕당근
la: Pastinaca sativa
li: Pingstelnakel
lt: Paprastasis pastarnokas
mk: пашканат
nb: pastinakk
nl: pastinaak
nn: pastinakk
pl: pasternak
pt: pastinaca
ro: Păstârnac
ru: Пастернак
sh: Paškanat
sk: paštrnák
sl: Pastinak
sr: Пашканат, paškanat
sv: Palsternacka
th: พาซนิพ
tl: Pastinaca
tr: yabani havuç
uk: Пастернак
ur: شقاقل
vi: Củ cải vàng
wa: Pastinåke
zh: 欧防风

en: Cooked parsnip
fr: Panais cuit
it: pastinaca cotta

en: radish, Radishes
am: ፍጁል
ar: فجل
az: Qırmızı turp
ba: Торма
be: Рэдзька пасяўная
bg: репичка
bn: মূলা
bo: ལ་ཕུག
br: Irvin-ruz
ca: rave
co: Radichju
cs: ředkvička
cy: Rhuddygl y gerddi
da: radise, ræddike
de: rettich, Radieschen
el: Ρεπάνι
eo: rafano
es: rábano, Rábanos, Rabanitos
et: Redis
eu: Errefau
fa: ترب
fi: Retiisi, retikka, retiisiä
fr: radis
ga: Raidis
gl: Ravo
he: צנון
hi: मूली
hr: rotkvica
ht: Radi
hu: Retek
id: Lobak
is: Hreðka
it: ravanello
ja: ダイコン (広義)
jv: Lobak
ka: ბოლოკი
kk: Шомыр
km: مُج
kn: ಮೂಲಂಗಿ
ko: 무
ku: Tivir
kv: Кушман
ky: Түрп
la: Raphanus sativus
lv: redīsi
mk: ротквичка
ml: മുള്ളങ്കി
mn: Таримал манжин
mr: मुळा
nb: reddik
nl: radijs
nn: reddik
nv: Akétłʼóól łichxííʼí yázhí
oc: Rafe
or: ମୂଳା
os: Булкъ
pa: ਮੂਲੀ
pl: rzodkiew, rzodkwi, rzodkiewka, rzodkiewki
ps: مولۍ
pt: Rabanete
qu: Rawanushcu
ro: Ridiche
ru: Редис
rw: Radi
sa: मूलकम्
sh: Rotkvica
sk: Reďkev siata
sl: Redkvica
sq: Rrepa
sr: Ротквица
su: Lobak
sv: Rädisa, rättika
ta: முள்ளங்கி
te: ముల్లంగి
tg: Турб
tl: Labanos
to: Lētisifoha
tr: Turp
tt: Редис
tv: Турма
uk: Редька
ur: لال مولی
uz: Turp
vi: Cải củ
wa: Rådisse
yi: רעטעך
za: lauxbaeg
zh: 萝卜

en: black radish
bg: черна ряпа
de: Schwarzer Winter-Rettich
fr: radis noir, radis d'Espagne
hr: crna rotkva
it: ravanello nero
nl: rammenas
pl: rzodkiew czarna

en: red radish
fr: radis rouge
hr: crvena rotkva, crvena rotkvica
it: ravanello rosso
ja: ラディッシュ
pl: rzodkiew czerwona, czerwona rzodkiew, czerwonej rzodkwi

en: radish sprouts
de: Radieschensprossen
hr: klice rotkvice
it: germogli di ravanello
pl: kiełki rzodkiewki

en: daikon, white radish, winter radish, oriental radish, long white radish
bg: бяла ряпа
ca: rave blanc
de: Winterrettich
es: rábano blanco
fr: radis blanc, radis d'hiver, radis chinois, daikon
hr: daikon
it: ravanello bianco
ja: ダイコン, 大根, だいこん
nl: witte rammenas
pl: biała rzodkiew, białej rzodkwi, rzodkiew biała

en: lotus root
de: Lotuswurzel, Lotuswurzeln
es: raíz de loto
fr: racine de lotus
hr: lotusov korijen
it: radice di loto
ja: レンコン, 蓮根, れんこん

en: okra
bg: бамя
de: Okra, Gemüse-Eibisch
es: quimbombó, quingombó, gombo, molondrón, ocra, okra, bamia, candia, abelmosco, ñajú
fr: gombo
hr: bamija
it: gombo, ocra, okra
ja: オクラ
nl: okra
pt: Quiabo

en: salad, leafy greens, salad greens
da: salat
de: Salat
es: Ensalada
fi: salaatti, salaatit
fr: salade
hr: salata
hu: saláta
it: Insalata
nl: salade
ru: зелень
sv: Sallad
zh: 沙拉

en: batavia
fr: batavia
sv: batavia

en: green baby batavia
sv: grön babybatavia

en: red baby batavia
sv: röd babybatavia

en: rocket, arugula, garden rocket, eruca, rucola, rucoli, rugula, colewort, roquette, salad rocket
ar: جرجير
az: əkin indausu
be: індаў пасяўны
bg: рукола, ерука, посевна ерука
bn: রকেট সালাদ
br: roketez
co: rutulella
cs: roketa setá
da: rucola, rucolasalat, salatsennep
de: Rucola, Garten-Senfrauke, Rauke, Rukola
el: ρόκα
eo: kultiva eruko
es: rúcula, rúcola, rúgula, arrúgula, arúgula, jaramago, oruga, roqueta, ruca
et: rukola, põld-võõrkapsas
fa: منداب
fi: sinappikaali, rucola
fr: roquette, riquette
ga: ruachán
gl: eiruga
he: בן-חרדל מצוי
hr: rukola
hu: borsmustár, rukkola
hy: ճարճրուկ ցանովի
is: klettasalat
it: ruchetta, rughetta, rucola, ruca
ja: ルッコラ
ka: რუკოლა
kk: егістік қышатүс
ko: 루콜라
la: eruca vesicaria, eruca sativa mill, eruca vesicaria subsp. sativa, brassica eruca l.
lt: rukola
ml: അറൂഗ്യുള
mt: eruka
nb: ruccola
nl: rucola, raketsla, zwaardherik
pa: ਤਾਰਾਮੀਰਾ
pl: rokietta siewna, rukolą, rukola, rukoli
pt: rúcula
ro: voinicică
ru: руккола
sd: ڄانڀو
sq: sallatë manushaqeje
sr: рукола
sv: rucola, rucolasallad, ruccola, ruccolasallad
tr: roka
uk: рукола
zh: 芝麻菜

en: baby arugula
de: Babyrucola
fr: Jeunes pousses de roquette
hr: beba rikula
it: rucola baby

en: wild rocket
it: rucola selvatica
la: diplotaxis tenuifolia

en: sorrel or acid
da: syre
it: acetosa o acido

en: oak leaf lettuce
de: Eichenblattsalat
fi: tammenlehtisalaatti
fr: Feuille de Chêne
hr: hrastova lisna salata
it: lattuga foglia di quercia
nl: Eikenbladsla